Alaska statutes. Title 44. State Government.
Article 7. Pioneers’ Homes Advisory Board.

Sec. 44.29.500.
Alaska Pioneers’ Homes Advisory Board.

There is created the Alaska Pioneers’ Homes Advisory Board in the Department of Health and Social Services.

History.

(E.O. No. 108, § 6 (2003))

Sec. 44.29.510.
Purpose of the board.

The board shall conduct annual inspections of the property and procedures of the Alaska Pioneers’ Homes and recommend to the governor changes and improvements. The board shall meet on an annual basis to review admissions procedures and to consider complaints.

History.

(E.O. No. 108, § 6 (2003))

Sec. 44.29.520.
Composition of the board.

The Alaska Pioneers’ Homes Advisory Board consists of

five members appointed by the governor from among citizens of the state;

one member appointed by the governor who is a veteran of active service in the armed forces of the United States, including the Alaska National Guard or the Alaska Territorial Guard;

one member who is the chair of the Alaska Commission on Aging established in AS 47.44.200; and

one member who is chair of the Alaska Veterans Advisory Council established in AS 44.35.

The term of office of a member of the board appointed under (a)(1) of this section is four years. A member of the board may not serve more than eight consecutive years. A chair shall be elected by the voting members of the board. The members of the board appointed under (a)(1) and (2) of this section serve at the pleasure of the governor.

History.

(E.O. No. 108, § 6 (2003); am § 26 ch 99 SLA 2004)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2003, in (a)(1) of this section, “AS

47.45.200

” was substituted for “AS 47.44.200” to reflect the 2003 renumbering of AS 47.44.200.

Sec. 44.29.530.
Compensation, per diem, or expenses.

Members of the advisory board receive no salary, but are entitled to per diem and travel expenses authorized by law for other boards.

History.

(E.O. No. 108, § 6 (2003))

Cross references. —

For per diem and travel expenses, see AS

39.20.180

.